Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 21.55.400.
Duties of director.

The director may

approve the selection of the plan administrator by the association and approve the association’s contract with the plan administrator, including the coverages and premiums to be charged;

contract with the federal government or another unit of government to ensure coordination of the state plans with other governmental assistance programs;

undertake, directly or through contracts with other persons, studies or demonstration programs to develop awareness of the benefits of this chapter; and

formulate general policy and adopt regulations that are reasonably necessary to administer this chapter, including regulations establishing a reinsurance program reinsuring residents who are high risks and specifying covered conditions eligible for payment through the reinsurance program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 18 ch 31 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 52 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 5 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which amended this section, see 2016 House Journal 1941 — 1942.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 19, 2016, in (4), inserted “that are reasonably necessary to administer this chapter” following “adopt regulations” and substituted “and specifying covered conditions eligible for payment through the reinsurance program” for “, that are reasonably necessary to administer this chapter”.

Sec. 21.55.410.
State not liable.

The state is not liable for acts or omissions of the association or a plan administrator under this chapter, nor is the state liable for payment of a claim under a state plan issued by a plan administrator.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 31 SLA 1999)

Sec. 21.55.420.
Board member civil and criminal immunity.

A member of the board of directors of the association may not be held civilly or criminally liable for an act or omission if the act or omission was in good faith and within the scope of the director’s duties under this chapter.

History.

(§ 11 ch 125 SLA 1994)

Sec. 21.55.430.
Alaska comprehensive health insurance fund. [Repealed June 30, 2024.]

The Alaska comprehensive health insurance fund is established in the general fund. The Department of Administration shall deposit interest earned on the Alaska comprehensive health insurance fund in the general fund.

The legislature may use the annual estimated balance in the Alaska comprehensive health insurance fund to make appropriations to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to fund the reinsurance program under this chapter.

Payment for claims under the reinsurance program under this chapter is subject to appropriation.

Money in the fund does not lapse.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

[Repealed, § 3ch 46 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 5 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 46 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 6,
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 as amended by sec. 2, ch. 46, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which amended this section, see 2016 House Journal 1941 — 1942.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read, “the Department of Administration shall separately account for revenue collected under AS

21.09.210

, AS

21.33.055

,

21.33.061

, AS

21.34.180

, and AS

21.66.110

and deposit net proceeds into the Alaska Comprehensive Health Insurance fund.”; repealed (f).

Effective dates. —

Although the enactment of this section was to have taken effect June 30, 2016 under sec. 9,
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until July 18, 2016, and so the actual effective date of this section was July 19, 2016, under
AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 7,
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016, this section "is retroactive to June 30, 2016.''

Sec. 21.55.430.
Alaska comprehensive health insurance fund.

History.

(§ 3 ch 5 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 46 SLA 2018)

Sec. 21.55.500.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“association” means the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association created in AS

21.55.010

;

“copayment” means the portion of the eligible expenses, in excess of the deductible, for which the insured is responsible;

“creditable coverage” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“deductible” means the portion of eligible expenses for which the insured is responsible in each calendar year under AS

21.55.120(a)

;

“federal continuation provision” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“federally defined eligible individual” means an individual

with an aggregate of all periods of creditable coverage as provided under AS

21.54.110(b)

of 18 or more months as of the date that the individual seeks coverage under this chapter;

whose most recent prior creditable coverage was under a health benefit plan or health care insurance plan offered in the large employer group market or the small employer group market;

who is not eligible for coverage under a health benefit plan, 42 U.S.C. 1395c or 42 U.S.C. 1395j (Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act), or a state plan under 42 U.S.C. 1396 (Title XIX of the Social Security Act), and who does not have other health care insurance coverage;

whose most recent coverage within the period of aggregate creditable coverage as provided under AS

21.54.110(b)

was not terminated based on a factor relating to nonpayment of premiums or fraud;

who, having been offered and having elected continuation coverage under a federal continuation provision or a similar state program, has exhausted coverage under the continuation provision or program;

“group market” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health benefit plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care insurance plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health insurance” has the meaning given in AS

21.12.050

;

“home health agency services” means any of the following services provided upon recommendation of a licensed physician as part of a treatment plan:

intermittent or part-time nursing services of a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse, that are provided to a person under the continued direction of the person’s physician and within the limitation of the nurse’s license;

nursing services that are provided to a person at the person’s residence, including a residential care facility or adult boarding home; a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility is not considered a residence;

home health aide services that are prescribed by and under the continued direction of a physician and supervised by a registered nurse;

home health aide services that are provided to a person at the person’s residence, as described in (B) of this paragraph;

physical and occupational therapy services, speech pathology, and audiology services that are prescribed by a physician and provided to a person by or under the supervision of a qualified practitioner; these services may be provided to a person who is a patient in an intermediate care facility or skilled nursing facility;

“hospice services” means services provided under a coordinated comprehensive program of palliative and supportive care on a 24-hour, seven days per week basis for persons who have been diagnosed as terminally ill and their families by an interdisciplinary team of professionals or volunteers under an incorporated central administration that has a physician as medical director;

“major medical”

means health insurance or medical care coverage provided on an expense incurred basis, including Medicare supplement insurance;

does not include coverage for dental only, vision only, long-term care, nursing home care, home health care, community-based care, accident only, disability income, hospital confinement indemnity or other fixed indemnity, or credit, specified disease or specified accident, or other supplemental health insurance or coverage determined by the board not to constitute major medical and approved by the director;

“medical social services” means services rendered the patient under the direction of a physician by a qualified social worker holding a master’s degree from an accredited school of social work, including assessment of the social, psychological and family problems related to or arising out of the covered person’s illness and treatment, appropriate action and utilization of community resources to assist in resolving the problems, and participation in the development of treatment for the covered person;

“plan administrator” means an eligible entity that is licensed as a third-party administrator under AS 21.27 and is selected by the board and approved by the director to administer a state plan;

“preexisting condition exclusion” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“qualified TAA eligible individual” means a qualifying individual as defined under 26 U.S.C. 35 (Internal Revenue Code, as enacted by sec. 201(a) of the Trade Adjustment Assistance Reform Act of 2002);

“resident” means

except for a federally defined eligible individual or TAA eligible individual, an individual who meets the eligibility requirements in AS

43.23.005

; or

for a federally defined eligible individual or TAA eligible individual, an individual who is legally domiciled in this state;

“residents who are high risks” means residents who

have been rejected for medical reasons after applying for a subscriber contract, a policy of health insurance, or a Medicare supplement policy by at least one association member within the six months immediately preceding the date of application for a state plan; medical reasons may include preexisting medical conditions, a family history that predicts future medical conditions, or an occupation that generates a frequency or severity of injury or disease that results in coverage not being generally available;

have had a restrictive rider placed on a subscriber contract, a health insurance policy, or a Medicare supplement policy that substantially reduces coverage; or

meet other requirements adopted by regulation by the director that are consistent with this chapter;

“state plan” means a policy of insurance offered by the association through a plan administrator;

“TAA eligible individual” means an eligible individual or a qualifying family member as defined under 26 U.S.C. 35 (Internal Revenue Code, as enacted by sec. 201(a) of the Trade Adjustment Assistance Reform Act of 2002); and

“usual, customary, reasonable, or prevailing charge” means the charge for a medical care procedure, service, or supply item that is the lowest of the following amounts:

the billed amount for the medical service provider’s actual charge;

the charge usually made by that provider for performing that procedure or service or for providing the supply item; or

the customary charge, based on a profile of charges made for the same medical procedure, service, or supply item in the same geographical area by other providers that have performed the same procedure or service or can provide the same supply item.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1992; am § 12 ch 125 SLA 1994; am § 77 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 67, 68 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 20 — 24 ch 31 SLA 1999; am §§ 6, 7 ch 102 SLA 2003; am § 28 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 7 ch 108 SLA 2006; am § 21 ch 30 SLA 2009; am § 39 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 4 ch 5 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs in this section were renumbered in 1997, 1999, and 2003 to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 5, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which amended this section, see 2016 House Journal 1941 — 1942.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective June 25, 2005, inserted “that is licensed as a third-party administrator under AS 21.27 and is” and made stylistic changes in paragraph (16).

The 2006 amendment, effective November 6, 2006, rewrote paragraph (14).

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, repealed and reenacted (19), which read, “ ‘resident’ means (A) except for a federally defined eligible individual or TAA eligible individual, an individual who (i) is physically present in the state, has lived in the state for at least the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the application for a state plan, and intends to remain permanently in the state; or (ii) is not physically present in the state if the person lived in the state for at least nine of the 12 months immediately preceding application for a state plan and the person’s absence from the state is for medical treatment or education; or (B) for a federally defined eligible individual or TAA eligible individual, an individual who is legally domiciled in this state; ‘resident’ does not include an individual who is absent from the state for more than 90 consecutive days for reasons other than for medical treatment or education;”.

The first 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (12)(A), deleted “professional” following “a registered”, in (12)(C), substituted “registered nurse” for “professional nurse” at the end.

The second 2016 amendment, effective July 19, 2016, in (20)(C), deleted “and that indicate that a person is unable to obtain coverage substantially similar to that which may be obtained by a person who is considered a standard risk” following “chapter”.